src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/V-vueqlghghed_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - vueʹlǧǧed: # Verb 'to set off' - full paradigm
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Inf: vueʹlǧǧed
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuâlǥam
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuâlǥak
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuâlgg
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vueʹlǧǧep
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vueʹlǧǧveʹted
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [vueʹlǧǧe, vuâʹlǧǧe, vuäʹlǧǧe, vuäʹlǧǧa]
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: vueʹljet
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vueʹlj
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [vuõʹlǧǧem]
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [vuõʹlǧǧiǩ]
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [vuõʹlji, vueʹlji]
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [vuõʹljim, vuõʹljin, vueʹljim, vueʹljin]
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [vuõʹljid, vueʹljid]
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [vuõʹlǧǧe, vueʹlǧǧe]
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: vuõʹlǧǧeš
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vuâlggam
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Pot+Sg1: [vuõʹljžem, vueʹljžem]
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Pot+Sg2: [vuõʹljžiǩ, vueʹljžiǩ]
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Pot+Sg3: [vuõʹljež, vueʹljež]
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Pot+Pl1: [vuõʹljžep, vueʹljžep, vuõʹljžim, vueʹljžim, vuõʹljžin, vueʹljžin]
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Pot+Pl2: [vuõʹljžid, vueʹljžid] 
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Pot+Pl3: [vuõʹljže, vueʹljže]
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Pot+Sg4: [vuõʹljžet, vueʹljžet]
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Pot+ConNeg: [vuõʹljže, vueʹljže]
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Cond+Sg1: vuâlǥčem
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Cond+Sg2: vuâlǥčiǩ
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Cond+Sg3: vuâlǥči
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Cond+Pl1: [vuâlǥčim, vuâlǥčin, vuâlǥčep]
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Cond+Pl2: vuâlǥčid
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Cond+Pl3: vuâlǥče
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Cond+Sg4: vuâlǥčeš
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Cond+ConNeg: vuâlǥče
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Imprt+Sg2: vueʹlj
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Imprt+Sg3: vuâlǥas
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Imprt+Pl1: vueʹlǧǧep
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Imprt+Pl2: vueʹlǧǧed
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Imprt+Pl3: vuâlggaz
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Imprt+ConNeg: vueʹlj
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Imprt+ConNegII: vuõlggu
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Actio+Ess: vueʹlǧǧmen
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Actio: vueʹlǧǧem
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Act+PrsPrc: [vuõʹlǧǧi, vueʹlǧǧi]
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Act+PrfPrc: vuâlggam
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: vuõlggum
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+VAbess: [vueʹljkani, vueʹljǩeännai]
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ger+Ess: vueʹljeen
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ger+Instr: vueʹljeeʹl
     vueʹlǧǧed+V+Act+PrfPrc: vuâlggam
